apertium-sme-smj.sme.lexc
LEXICON ab-nodot-adj
!+ABBR:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +A+ABBR+Attr:%> # ; ! no period, that is. 
 +A+ABBR+Nom:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +A+ABBR+Acc:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +A+ABBR+Gen:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +A+ABBR:%>%- RAbbr ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adv
! +ABBR:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +Adv+ABBR:%> # ; ! Adv without case, consider this.
! +Adv+ABBR+Attr:%> # ; ! no period, that is. 
! +Adv+ABBR+Nom:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
! +Adv+ABBR+Acc:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
! +Adv+ABBR+Gen:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
! +Adv+ABBR:%>%- RAbbr ;
 
 LEXICON ab-nodot-num
!+ABBR:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +Num+ABBR+Nom:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +Num+ABBR+Acc:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +Num+ABBR+Gen:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +Num+ABBR:%>%- RAbbr ;


! Still not in use.
!LEXICON ab-nodot-cc
! +ABBR+CC:%> # ; ! no period, that is. 

LEXICON ab-nodot ! default
!+ABBR:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+Attr:%> # ; ! no period, that is. 
 +ABBR+Nom:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+Acc:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR+Gen:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +ABBR:%>%- RAbbr ;


! Here come POS and Case tags, with the period added.

LEXICON ab-dot ! Default
 +ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+Acc:%.%> # ; 
 +ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ; 

LEXICON ab-dot-noun ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
 +N+ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ; 
 +N+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ; 
 +N+ABBR+Acc:%.%> # ; 
 +N+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ; 
 +N+ABBR+Ill:%.%>%:i # ; 
 +N+ABBR+Loc:%.%>%:s # ; 
 +N+ABBR+Com:%.%>%:in # ; 
 +N+ABBR+Ess:%.%>%:n # ; 
 +N+ABBR+Ill+Use/Sub:%.%>%:ii # ; !
 +N+ABBR+Loc+Use/Sub:%.%>%:as # ; !
 +N+ABBR+Com+Use/Sub:%.%>%:ain # ; !
 +N+ABBR+Ess+Use/Sub:%.%>%:an # ; !
 +N+ABBR:%>%- RAbbr ;

! The idea is that the nominal ones may have case, like e.g. P.E.N. 

LEXICON ab-dot-adj ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +ABBR:%.%> # ; 
 +A+ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ; 
 +A+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ; 
 +A+ABBR+Acc:%.%> # ; 
 +A+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ; 
 
LEXICON ab-dot-adv ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
 +Adv+ABBR:%.%> # ; ! Adv without case.
 
LEXICON ab-dot-num ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +ABBR:%.%> # ; 
 +Num+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ; 
 +Num+ABBR+Acc:%.%> # ; 
 +Num+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ; 

LEXICON ab-dot-cc
 +CC+ABBR:%.%> # ; 


! Then, as an afterthought, come our two verbs, gč. and vrd.

LEXICON ab-verb ! A lexicon for "gč." and perhaps also other abbreviated verbs.
 ab-dot-verb ;
 ab-nodot-verb ;
 ab-dot-IVprfprc ;

LEXICON ab-dot-verb
 +V+ABBR+TV+Imprt:%.%> # ; ! Period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-verb 
 +V+ABBR+TV+Imprt:%> # ; ! No period.
! # ;
 
! riegádan:

LEXICON ab-dot-IVprfprc 
 +V+ABBR+IV+PrfPrc:%.%> # ; ! Period.
 
 

 
! The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------



! =============================================== !
! Intransitive abbreviations !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON NOAB
! This class contains homonyms, which are both intransitive 
! abbreviations and normal words. The abbreviation usage
! is less common and thus only the occurences in the middle of
! the sentnece can be considered as true cases.

 du ab-dot-noun ; !dualis


! ============================================================ !
! Abreviations who are transitive in front of numerals !
! ============================================================ !

LEXICON Punctuation

! Clause boundary symbols

%,+CLB:%,   # ;
%.+CLB:%.   # ;
%.%.+CLB:%.%.   # ;
%.%.%.+CLB:%.%.%.   # ;
%:+CLB:%:   # ;
%;+CLB:%;	  # ;
 ^excl+CLB+Use/Circ:%!	  # ;	!
 %?+CLB:%?	  # ; !Question mark
…+CLB:…		  # ;
 ¿+CLB:¿		  # ;	! Only seen as noise.
 ¶+CLB:¶		  # ;	! This sign is for titles, it is introduced by the
			! catxml script, and may be changed if it interferes 
			! with real pilcrow signs.

LEXICON ITRAB
ref ab-dot-noun ;
 a./g+Use/Circ:a./g ab-dot-noun; !
 am ab-dot ; !
 anat ab-dot-adj ; !anatomalaš !
 bearj+Use/Sub:bearj9 ab-dot-noun ; ! !Bearjadat
 bearjad+Use/Sub:bearjad9 ab-dot-noun ; !
 bfr ab-nodot ; !
 biehttalanh ab-dot-noun ; !
a.D ab-dot-noun ;
at ab-dot-noun ;
can ab-dot-noun ;
kan ab-dot-noun ;
gl.res ab-dot-noun ;
gt ab-dot-noun ;
Jak ab-dot-noun ;
kat ab-dot-noun ;
kl ab-dot-noun ;
korr ab-dot-noun ;
kons ab-dot-noun ;
kto ab-dot-noun ;
lab ab-dot-noun ;
govvalab ab-dot-noun ;
lat ab-dot-noun ;
doavttirgrádastip ab-dot-noun ;
lingv ab-dot-noun ;
log ab-dot-noun ;
med ab-dot-noun ;
miner ab-dot-noun ;
mod ab-dot-noun ;
nd ab-dot ;
neg ab-dot-noun ;
nto ab-dot-noun ;
obsol ab-dot-noun ;
op ab-dot-noun ;
ord ab-dot-noun ;
oss ab-dot-noun ;
pa ab-dot-noun ;
par ab-dot-noun ;
part.prf ab-dot-noun ;
pass ab-dot-noun ;
pm ab-dot-noun ;
pos ab-dot-noun ;
post ab-dot-noun ;
pp ab-dot-noun ;
pt ab-dot-noun ;
pts ab-dot-noun ;
reg ab-dot-noun ;
rek ab-dot-noun ;
sic ab-dot-noun ;
sivil#ing ab-dot-noun ;
st ab-dot-noun ;
st.dieđ ab-dot-noun ;
p.b ab-dot-noun ;
st.prp ab-dot-noun ;
tlg ab-dot-noun ;
vol ab-dot-noun ;
vulg ab-dot-noun ;
biol ab-dot-adj ; 
bot ab-dot-adj ; 
bto ab-dot ; 
ráŋggáštusč ab-dot-noun ;
ráŋggáštč ab-dot-noun ;
 c/o+Use/Circ:c/o ab-nodot; ! 
 ca ab-dot ; !
 can$+Use/Circ:can$ ab-nodot; ! !
 et ab-nodot ; !
 cc ab-dot ; !
 cea ab-dot-noun ; !
 C% U% L8R ab-nodot ; !
 daa ab-nodot ; !
 dB ab-nodot ; !
dea ab-dot-noun ;
 dearvvašvuođaoss:dearvvašvuođaoss9 ab-dot-noun ; !Dearvvašvuođaossodat
dearvvašvuođaosd ab-dot-noun ;
 ded ab-dot-noun ; !
 dept ab-dot-noun ; !
 dg ab-nodot ; !
 dhj ab-dot ; !
 do ab-dot ; !
 doaimm:doaimm9 ab-dot-noun ; !
 dual ab-dot-noun ; !dualis
dub ab-dot ;
parl ab-dot-noun ;
 duorast+Use/Sub:duorast ab-dot-noun; !
 eanadoallolávd ab-dot-noun ; !
eaŋg ab-dot-noun ;
estteg ab-dot-noun ;
 etc ab-dot-adv ; !
 euf ab-dot ; !
 f+Use/Circ:f ab-dot; ! !
 fac ab-dot-noun ; !
 fol ab-dot ; !
 fuolahus#osd ab-dot-noun ; !
anestesiija#osd ab-dot-noun ;
liike#osd ab-dot-noun ;
sis#dávda#osd ab-dot-noun ;
boras#dávda#osd ab-dot-noun ;
bargiid#osd ab-dot-noun ;
leasme#dávda#osd ab-dot-noun ;
čotta#osd ab-dot-noun ;
 gaskav+Use/Sub:gaskav ab-dot-noun; !
ov.sk.oahp ab-dot-noun ;
 geogr ab-dot-adj ; !geografiijas !
 geom ab-dot-adj ; !geometrihkala !š
ger ab-dot ;
 ggl ab-dot ; !
ggl.cea ab-dot ;
 gl ab-dot ; !
 gl.rs ab-dot ; !
 Gastro#lab ab-dot-noun ; !Org Gastrolaboratoria
Nagir#lab ab-dot-noun ;
 Guovdg ab-dot-noun ; !Plc Guovdageaidnu !
ha ab-nodot ;
 Hedm ab-dot-noun ; !Plc Hedmark
 hárv ab-dot ; !hárvenaš, hárvenaččat
 ib:ib9 ab-nodot ; !
 ibid:ibid9 ab-nodot ; !
P.S ab-dot ;
ID ab-dot-noun ;
impers ab-dot ;
indekl ab-dot ;
interr:interr9 ab-dot-adj ;
intr ab-dot-adj ;
ipmilbálv ab-dot-noun ;
 j.d ab-dot ; !
 j.d.s ab-dot ; !
 j.e ab-dot ; !
 j.s ab-dot ; !
j.v ab-dot-adv ;
 jd ab-dot ; !
 jdd ab-dot ; !
 je ab-dot ; !
 jed ab-dot ; !
jk1 ab-nodot ;
jk2 ab-nodot ;
journ ab-dot ;
Kp ab-dot ;
 js ab-dot ; !
 jur ab-dot-adj ; !juridihkalaš !
wo ab-nodot ;
 konkr ab-dot-adj; !konkrehta
kV ab-nodot ;
kvm ab-nodot ;
 l+Use/Circ:l ab-dot-noun; !
lm ab-nodot ;
Lohk ab-dot ;
 lp ab-dot-noun ; !laktapartihkkal
 lávv+Use/Sub:lávv ab-dot-noun; !Lávvardat !
m.fl ab-dot-noun ;
 matem ab-dot-adj ; !matematihkalaš
mearrid ab-dot ;
miljo ab-dot-num ;
máŋggaidl ab-dot ; 
 NewZ ab-dot-noun ; !New Zealand
 o.Kr ab-dot-adv ; !Does this exist?
od.prp ab-dot-noun ;
ped.jođ ab-dot-noun ;
oKr ab-dot-adv ;
op.cit ab-dot-noun ;
ovttaidl ab-dot-noun ;
ovttaj ab-dot-adj ;
ovttajie ab-dot-adj ;
ovttajien ab-dot-adj ;
 part ab-dot-noun ; !partihkkal
perf ab-dot-noun ;
pers ab-dot-noun ;
phil ab-dot-noun ;
pl ab-dot-noun ;
pr ab-dot ;
prep ab-dot-noun ;
prol ab-dot-noun ;
prot ab-dot-noun ;
prv ab-dot-noun ;
pvc ab-nodot ;
 relat ab-dot-adj ; !relatiiva
relig ab-dot-noun ;
res ab-dot ;
ruoŧag ab-dot-noun ;
s.v ab-dot ;
sg ab-dot ;
sl ab-dot ;
 Spd ab-dot-noun ; !
sup ab-dot-noun ;
tabl ab-dot-noun ;
trans ab-dot-noun ;
uŋgárg ab-dot-noun ;
vk ab-nodot ;
 Vuorká#ášše#nr ab-dot-noun ; !
 Áššemeannud ab-dot-noun ; !
 č.ortn ab-dot-noun ; !
 čs ab-dot ; !
LEXICON TRNUMAB
 Apd ab-dot-noun ; !
 Bnr ab-dot-noun ; !
 Kilde#gt ab-dot-noun ; !Kildegata
Poasta#nr ab-dot-noun ;
 Rt ab-dot-noun ; !
Ášše#nr ab-dot-noun ;
 alm ab-dot-adj ; !
 b.c ab-dot ; !b.c. 18-22
 bc ab-dot ; !bc. 30-42
 čk ab-dot ; !
djd ab-dot-noun ;
fáksa#nr ab-dot-noun ;
 j+Use/Circ:j ab-dot; ! !
 jnr ab-dot-noun ; !
mátke#tlf ab-dot-noun ;
org.nr ab-dot-noun ;
pgf ab-dot-noun ;
 rieg ab-dot-IVprfprc ; !riegádan
rievd ab-dot ;
spr ab-dot-noun ;
tii ab-dot-noun ;
LEXICON TRAB 
 1.aman+Use/Circ:1.aman ab-dot-noun; ! !1.amanuensis
 Boazod+Use/Sub:Boazod9 ab-dot-noun ; ! !XXX was ist dás?
 anár ab-dot ; !anársámegiella
 art ab-dot-noun ; !artihkkal, artium
 adr ab-dot-noun ; !adreassa
 avd.dir ab-dot-noun ; !
 Avd.dir ab-dot ; !Advelingsdirektør
 biht ab-dot-noun ; !
 borgem+Use/Sub:borgem ab-dot-noun; ! !
 buo ab-dot ; !
 cand.mag ab-dot-noun ; !
 cand.philol ab-dot-noun ; !
 cand.scient ab-dot-noun ; !
 cand:cand ab-dot-noun ; !
 Chr ab-dot ; !Christian
 d.l ab-dot-noun ; !
 darj ab-dot "Ter" ; !
 davvisuopm ab-dot-noun ; !
 dearvvašv ab-dot ; !
 Dep ab-dot ; !Departemeantta
 dhj ab-dot ; !dahje
 dipl.ing ab-dot-noun ; !
 dir ab-dot-noun ; !direktevra
 dr.art ab-dot-noun ; !doktor artium
 dr.philos ab-dot-noun ; !
 dr.theol ab-dot-noun ; !
dáb ab-dot-adv ;
 e.e ab-dot-adj ; !
 eksp ab-dot-noun ; !Eksp. áigi
 eksp.sj ab-dot-noun ; !
 eren ab-dot-adj ; !
erenoamášped ab-dot ; 
ex.fac ab-dot-noun ;
 fenr ab-dot-noun ; !
 fil.tri ab-dot-noun ; !
 geassem+Use/Sub:geassem ab-dot-noun; ! !
 genr ab-dot-noun ; !
 germ ab-dot-adj ; !
 gield ab-dot-adj "Kildin" ; !
 golggotm+Use/Sub:golggotm ab-dot-noun; ! !
 gárj ab-dot-adj ; !
 geahč ab-verb ; !Must accept no-dot
 gč ab-verb ; ! XXX accept no-dot (?) !
 Gč ab-dot-verb ; ! Reintrod. !
 H.K.H ab-dot-adj ; !Hans/hennes kongelige høyhet
 H.M ab-dot-adj ; !Hans/hennes majestet
 h.r.adv ab-dot-noun ; !
 inkl ab-dot-adj ; !
 Innst ab-dot-noun ; !Innstilling
 isl ab-dot-noun ; !
 juovlam+Use/Sub:juovlam ab-dot-noun; ! !
 kard ab-dot-noun ; !
 korp ab-dot-noun ; !
 Kr ab-dot-noun ; !Kristian, Kristin, Kristus
 lic ab-dot-noun ; !
 ltn ab-dot-noun ; !
 lul ab-dot-adj ; !lullisámegiela, lulesamisk
 lágid ab-dot-noun ; !Could be also verb
 mag.art ab-dot-noun ; !
 Mield ab-dot-noun ; !Mieldde
 milj ab-dot-num ; !
 mr ab-dot-noun ; !
 mrs ab-dot-noun ; !
 ms ab-dot-noun ; !
 mársm ab-dot-noun ; !
 njukčam+Use/Sub:njukčam ab-dot-noun; ! 
 nuort ab-dot-adj "Skolt" ; !
 o.m.d ab-dot-adv ; !
 oahp ab-dot-noun "teacher" ; !
 obl ab-dot-adj ; !
 oblt ab-dot-noun ; !
 Od.prop ab-dot-noun ; !Odeldikkeproposišuvdna
 Od.prp.nr ab-dot-noun ; !
 oecon ab-dot-noun ; !
 omd ab-dot-adv ; !
 omd:omd9 ab-nodot-adv ; !
 ossod.dir ab-dot-noun ; !ossodatdirektevra
 Oth:Oth9 ab-dot-noun ; !
 ovd+Use/Sub:ovd ab-dot-adv; !
 ovdasu ab-dot ; !
 ođđaj+Use/Sub:ođđaj ab-dot-noun; !
 ped ab-dot-adj ; !padagoga, pedagogihkka, pedagogalaš
 pharm ab-dot-adj ; !
 philol ab-dot-noun ; !
 pol ab-dot-adj ; !
 polit ab-dot-adj ; !
 priv ab-dot-adj ; !
Proavássb ab-dot-noun ;
 prp ab-dot-noun ; !
 psyk ab-dot-adj ; !
 r+None:r ab-dot-IVprfprc; !
 red ab-dot-noun ; !
 resipr ab-dot-adj ; !resiprohka TRAB or ITRAB?
 Sadj.b ab-dot-noun ; !Sadjebáhppa
sb ab-dot-noun ;
 skábmam+Use/Sub:skábmam ab-dot-noun; ! !
 sos ab-dot-adj ; !sosiálalaš
 St.d.nr ab-dot-noun; !
 St.dieđ ab-dot-noun ; !
 St.meld ab-dot-noun ; !
 St.nr ab-dot-noun ; !
 St.prp.nr ab-dot-noun ; !Stortingsproposisjon nummer
 stud.philol ab-dot-noun ; !
 sugr ab-dot-adj ; !suoma-ugralaš
 suopm ab-dot-noun ; !
 sá ab-dot-adj ; !
 sásu ab-dot ; !
Th ab-dot-noun ;
 tri ab-dot-noun ; !tohtori
 ubm ab-dot-adj ; !ubmesámegiella
 urál ab-dot-adj ; !urálalaš
Vik.pr ab-dot-noun ;
 vrd ab-dot-verb ; !
 Vrd ab-dot-verb ; !
 vrd:vrd9 ab-nodot-verb ; !veardit !
 Vrd:Vrd9 ab-nodot-verb ; !
 vs ab-dot-cc ; !
 vsá ab-dot-noun ; !
 čakčam+Use/Sub:čakčam ab-dot-noun; ! !
